Hawaii statutes.
[§481R-10] Cancellation of warranty.
(a) Each vehicle protection product warranty shall state the terms,
restrictions, or conditions if any, governing cancellation of the warranty by
the warrantor before the expiration date of the warranty. Cancellation may only
occur under this section for:

(1) Nonpayment by the consumer for the vehicle
protection product;

(2) A material misrepresentation by the consumer to
the seller or warrantor;

(3) Fraud by the consumer; or

(4) A substantial breach of duties by the consumer
relating to the warranty.

(b) A warrantor shall mail written notice of
cancellation to the consumer at the last address of the consumer contained in
the records of the warrantor at least thirty days prior to the effective date
of the cancellation. The notice shall state the effective date of the
cancellation and the reason for the cancellation. [L 2002, c 237, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next